test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_ishkodewidaabaan_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanish***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanish***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niishkodewidaabaaninaanibanan
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niishkodewidaabaaninaanibanag
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niishkodewidaabaaninaanibaning
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanan
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanag
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niishkodewidaabaaniwaaibaning
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niishkodewidaabaaniniibanan
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niishkodewidaabaaniniibanag
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niishkodewidaabaaniniibaning
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giishkodewidaabaaninaanibanan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giishkodewidaabaaninaanibanag
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giishkodewidaabaaninaanibaning
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanag
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giishkodewidaabaaniwaaibaning
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giishkodewidaabaaniniibanan
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giishkodewidaabaaniniibanag
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giishkodewidaabaaniniibaning
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaaninaanibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaaninaanibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaaninaanibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaaniwaaibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oishkodewidaabaaniniibanan
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oishkodewidaabaaniniibanag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oishkodewidaabaaniniibaning
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaaninaanibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaaninaanibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaaninaanibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaaninaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaaniwaaibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaaniwaaibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaaniwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaaniniibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaaniniibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaaniniibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ishkodewidaabaanensimishini
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensimish***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimishan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimishing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaan***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaaiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensiminiiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensimini***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaaiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminiiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaaag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaaing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensiminian
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensiminiag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensiminiing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaaag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaaing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminian
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminiag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensim***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensim***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensim***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhim***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhim***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaan***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaaiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensishiniiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensishini***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaaiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiniiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaaag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaaing
